Missouri, session 2026, HB2592.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 115.133, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 115.133, to read as follows:
115.133. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, any citizen of the
United States who is a resident of the state of Missouri and seventeen years and six months of
age or older shall be entitled to register and to vote in any election which is held on or after
his or her eighteenth birthday.
2. No person who is adjudged incapacitated shall be entitled to register or vote. No
person shall be entitled to vote:
(1) While confined under a sentence of imprisonment; or
(2) [While on probation or parole after conviction of a felony, until finally discharged
from such probation or parole; or
(3)] After conviction of a felony or misdemeanor connected with the right of suffrage.
3. Except as provided in federal law or federal elections and in section 115.277, no
person shall be entitled to vote if the person has not registered to vote in the jurisdiction of his
or her residence prior to the deadline to register to vote.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.